Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3505
New construction not required to use radon resistant new construction; when.

New construction after September 1, 2019, shall not be required to use radon resistant new construction if (1) the construction project utilizes the design of an architect or professional engineer licensed under the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, (2) the construction project is located in a county in which the average radon concentration is less than two and seven-tenths picocuries per liter of air as determined by the department pursuant to section 76-3507, or (3) other than for any residential dwelling unit, a local building official makes a determination, after a review of relevant guidelines for the intended use of the structure and property conditions, that radon resistant new construction is not necessary.

Laws 2017, LB9, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB130, § 8.

Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, see section 81-3401.